Tennessee, session 114, HB2536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-201, is amended by deleting
subsections (a) and (b) and substituting:
(a) There is created a state insurance committee to be composed of the
commissioner of human resources; the state treasurer; the commissioner of commerce
and insurance; the comptroller of the treasury; the commissioner of finance and
administration; the chair of the senate finance, ways and means committee; the chair of
the committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over finance matters;
and four (4) state employees. For purposes of this part, "state insurance committee"
means the state insurance committee created by this subsection (a).
(b)
(1) Three (3) state employees must be selected in accordance with a
procedure adopted by the state insurance committee, at least one (1) one whom
is a preferred service employee. The chair of the state insurance committee and
the chair of the consolidated retirement system board of trustees may develop a
procedure to coordinate the process for selection of state employee members to
each entity.
(2) One (1) state employee must be an employee of either the University
of Tennessee or the state university and community college system selected
HB2536
010655
- 1 -

under a procedure developed by the Tennessee higher education commission
and approved by the state insurance committee.
(3) Vacancies of state employee member positions must be filled by the
selection procedures established by subdivisions (b)(1) and (b)(2).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-301, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(a)
(1) There is created a local education insurance committee to be
composed of the commissioner of education, the state treasurer, the
commissioner of commerce and insurance, the comptroller of the treasury, the
commissioner of finance and administration, a representative of local school
boards to be selected by the commissioner of finance and administration, and
three (3) teachers employed by local education agencies who participate in the
group insurance plan established under this part. The teacher members must be
appointed in the same manner described in § 8-34-302(a)(9)(A).
(2) The commissioner of education, the state treasurer, the
commissioner of commerce and insurance, the comptroller of the treasury, and
the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to designate an
alternate representative to attend, participate, and vote at meetings of the local
education insurance committee when that respective member is unable to attend.
The designation of an alternate representative must be made in writing to the
chair of the local education insurance committee.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-701, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
- 2 - 010655

(a) There is created a local government insurance committee, to be composed
of the commissioner of finance and administration; the comptroller of the treasury; the
state treasurer; an employee or official of a municipality, as defined by § 6-51-101(2),
who participates in the group insurance plan established under this part; and an
employee or official of a county government who participates in the group insurance plan
established under this part. The municipality and county government members must be
appointed by the commissioner of finance and administration and must represent the
interests of all participating municipalities and counties, respectively.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 010655